Utah statutes.
31A-22-1013.   Department report on workers' compensation.
The department shall report annually to the Business and Labor Interim
Committee by no later than its October interim meeting on the following:
(1)  the cost and availability of workers' compensation insurance coverage in
Utah;
(2)  the results of the monitoring provided for in Section 31A-22-1012;
(3)  the size of the residual market as a percentage of the overall workers'
compensation insurance market in Utah;
(4)  which workers' compensation insurers in the state are the top ten that
held the largest market shares of Utah's workers' compensation insurance
market during the three calendar years preceding the report; and
(5)  any recommendations of the department to the Legislature to improve the
cost and availability of workers' compensation to Utah businesses.
